Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1560.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 49-1273, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-1273. Water supply development revolving fund; purposes A. Monies in the water supply development revolving fund may be used for the following purposes: 1. Making loans to eligible entities in this state under section 49-1274 for water supply development projects within this state. A single loan shall not exceed $3,000,000 $20,000,000. 2. Making grants or providing technical assistance to eligible entities for water supply development projects in this state. A single grant shall not exceed $2,000,000. 3. Purchasing or refinancing debt obligations of water providers at or below market rate if the debt obligation was issued for a water supply development purpose. 4. Providing financial assistance to water providers with bonding authority to purchase insurance for local bond obligations incurred by them for water supply development purposes. 5. Paying the costs to administer the fund. 6. Conducting water supply studies. B. If the monies pledged to secure water supply development bonds issued pursuant to section 49-1278 become insufficient to pay the principal and interest on the water supply development bonds guaranteed by the water supply development revolving fund, the authority shall direct the state treasurer to liquidate securities in the fund as may be necessary and shall apply those proceeds to make current all payments then due on the bonds. The state treasurer shall immediately notify the attorney general and auditor general of the insufficiency. The auditor general shall audit the circumstances surrounding the depletion of the fund and report the findings to the attorney general. The attorney general shall conduct an investigation and report those findings to the governor and the legislature.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.